Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2080.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 510 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 510. Disposition of Unserviceable Personal Property; Surplus or Unserviceable Road, Bridge Materials or Equipment.--[Whenever] (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), whenever any furnishings, or other personal property of this Commonwealth, shall be no longer of service to the Commonwealth, [it shall be the duty of] the department, board, or commission[, in whose] in possession [such] of the property [shall be or come, to put such] shall place the property into the custody of the Department of [Property and Supplies: Provided, however, That in] General Services.(1) In the case of any perishable property which is not in the city of Harrisburg, the department, board, or commission[, having possession of the same,] in possession of the perishable property may sell it in such manner, and upon such terms, as the head of the department, [or the] board, or commission, may determine[: And provided further, That any].(2) Any road or bridge [materials] material or equipment located in a political subdivision that [have] has been declared surplus or unserviceable by the Department of [Highways] Transportation shall be subject to the following:(i) The material or equipment shall be first offered free of charge to the political subdivision, provided the political subdivision agrees to transport the material or equipment from the site.(ii) If the political subdivision fails to agree, the material or equipment shall be offered for sale to [counties, cities, boroughs, incorporated towns and townships] other political subdivisions at the best available price by the Department of [Property and Supplies.] General Services.(iii) Written notification of the availability of [such] the 20250HB2080PN2669 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 material and equipment shall be given to all [counties, cities, boroughs, incorporated towns and townships] political subdivisions in the highway district in which [such] the material and equipment was last used.(iv) If more than one [such] of the political [subdivision] subdivisions requests the same material or equipment, any sale shall be made to the political subdivision making the highest letter bid. [No sale shall](v) A sale may not be consummated until after a minimum of fifteen (15) days from the date of mailing the notification.(vi) All [such] of the material and equipment shall be used by the procuring political subdivision upon roads, streets and bridges.(vii) All moneys received for [such] the sale of the material and equipment shall be deposited in the Motor License Fund.(b) (1) Millings collected from a road or bridge project located in a political subdivision shall be first offered free of charge to the political subdivision, provided the political subdivision agrees to collect and transport the millings from a location determined by the Department of Transportation. If the political subdivision declines the offer, the millings shall be offered for sale as required by this section.(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), millings obtained by a political subdivision under paragraph (1) shall be used by the political subdivision for road, bridge and other projects within the political subdivision.(3) If a political subdivision obtains millings as described in paragraph (1) and is unable to make use of the millings as described in paragraph (2), the political subdivision may sell 20250HB2080PN2669 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the millings. All money received from the sale of millings by the political subdivision shall be remitted to the Department of Transportation for deposit into the Motor License Fund.(4) For purposes of this subsection, the term "political subdivision" does not include a county.(c) As used in this section:"Millings" means fragments of recyclable road surface materials produced and collected during the removal of a road surface."Political subdivision" means a county, city, borough, incorporated town or township."Unserviceable [property," as used in this section, shall] property" does not include products manufactured, grown, or raised, by any department, board, or commission, or by the inmates or patients of any State institution, or minerals, oil, gas, or other materials, taken from any property of the Commonwealth. [It shall include] The term includes only articles previously purchased by the Commonwealth, or any agency thereof, and paid for out of funds of or in the control of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2080PN2669 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021